Washington statutes.
RCW 41.35.080

Members agree to deductions.

The deductions from the compensation of members, provided for in RCW 41.35.430, shall be made notwithstanding that the minimum compensation provided for by law for any member shall be reduced thereby. Every member shall be deemed to consent and agree to the deductions made and provided for in this chapter and receipt in full for his or her salary or compensation, and payment, less the deductions, shall be a full and complete discharge and acquittance of all claims and demands whatsoever for the services rendered by the person during the period covered by the payment, except as to benefits provided for under this chapter.

[ 1998 c 341 s 9.]